Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB786.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 311.530 TO 311.620 IS CREATED
TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Notwithstanding any of the requirements for medical licensure in KRS 311.571,
an international medical graduate may apply for a provisional license that may
lead to a full and unrestricted license to practice medicine in Kentucky.
(2) By January 1, 2026, the board shall promulgate administrative regulations in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13A that establish a provisional licensure pathway
for international medical graduates to obtain a full and unrestricted license to
practice medicine in Kentucky. The administrative regulations shall:
(a) Establish criteria for acceptable foreign medical schools that provide
medical education that is reasonably comparable to those of medical
schools in the United States from which applicants may be accepted;
(b) Require that the applicant have an offer of full-time employment as a
physician from a Kentucky health care provider and:
1. Maintain employment for at least two (2) consecutive years; and
2. Notify the board within five (5) business days of any change of
employer;
(c) Require that the applicant has:
1. An unencumbered license in a foreign country;
2. A license in good standing for the immediately preceding five (5)
years, without pending disciplinary action;
3. Actively practiced medicine for the entire five (5) year period
preceding his or her application;
4. Completed a residency or substantially similar postgraduate medical
residency program accredited by the Accreditation Council for
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 2/19/2025 1:34 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1894
Graduate Medical Education;
5. Had his or her credentials evaluated and certified by the Educational
Commission for Foreign Medical Graduates; and
6. Passed the Educational Commission for Foreign Medical Graduates
examinations, including the United States Medical Licensing
Examination Steps 1 and 2 and the Occupational English Test,
Medicine;
(d) Establish eligibility requirements for a full and unrestricted license to
practice medicine in Kentucky upon successfully completing a provisional
licensure period, including:
1. Board assessment of each applicant on his or her merits;
2. A requirement that the applicant not have any disciplinary actions or
investigations pending from his or her provisional licensure period;
3. Evidence of fulfillment of employment requirements during the
provisional period; and
4. No evidence of engaging in unacceptable conduct under KRS 311.595
or 311.597; and
(e) 1. Establish a process to collect information to facilitate evaluation of the
provisional license pathway to determine whether it is meeting the
intended purpose. The information shall include but not be limited to:
a. The number of applicants;
b. The number of internationally trained physicians receiving
provisional licensure under the pathway and the number denied
provisional licensure under the pathway;
c. The number of individuals achieving full and unrestricted
licensure;
d. The percentage of individuals that stay and practice in their
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 2/19/2025 1:34 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1894
specialty of training and in rural or underserved areas;
e. The number of complaints received and any disciplinary actions
taken;
f. The practice setting and specialty of applicants;
g. The number who ultimately remain in the United States;
h. The number of individuals achieving specialty board
certification; and
i. The costs to the board of operating an additional licensing
pathway.
2. Not later than December 1, 2026, and annually thereafter, the board
shall submit a report on its findings to the Legislative Research
Commission for referral to the Interim Joint Committee on Health
Services.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 2/19/2025 1:34 PM Jacketed